Hawaii statutes.
[§613-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Alternative dispute resolution" or
"ADR" means methods, procedures, or techniques that are used to
resolve differences voluntarily and that do not require a traditional and
formal adjudicatory trial or contested hearing. These methods include, but are
not limited to, mediation, contractual arbitration, fact- finding,
consensus-building, and neutral-expert evaluation.

"Board" means the board of advisors
of the center for alternative dispute resolution.

"Center" means the center for
alternative dispute resolution.

"Government agencies" means the
offices, departments, branches, and other subdivisions of state and county
governments. [L 1989, c 346, pt of §2; am L 1991, c 131, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next